Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 12

Demolition of Historic Structures

7-51-1201. Restrictions on demolition of residential structures — Approval of demolition.

No owner may demolish any residential structure that meets all of the following criteria, unless the county or municipal legislative body, as provided in this part, approves by majority vote such demolition:

The residential structure was originally constructed before 1865;

The residential structure is reparable at a reasonable cost; and

The residential structure has an historical significance besides age itself, including, but not limited to, uniqueness of architecture, occurrence of historical events, notable former residents, design by a particular architect, or construction by a particular builder.

Acts 1989, ch. 416, § 1.

7-51-1202. Jurisdiction.

If such property is located within the boundaries of a municipality, the municipal legislative body shall approve the demolition and no county approval shall be required.

If such property is located outside the boundaries of a municipality, the county legislative body shall approve the demolition.

Acts 1989, ch. 416, § 1.

7-51-1203. Approval not granted — Condemnation or purchase.

If approval is not granted, the county or municipality shall proceed with a condemnation proceeding as provided in title 29, chapter 17, or purchase the property in question within a reasonable period of time, which shall not exceed ninety (90) days.

Acts 1989, ch. 416, § 1.

7-51-1204. Applicability of part.

This part shall apply in any county having a population of more than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and shall be inapplicable to such residential structures within the right-of-way of projects administered by the department of transportation whenever a determination has been made that such structures are of historical significance and plans for their disposition or preservation have been coordinated with and concurred in by the state historic preservation officer of the Tennessee historical commission.

Acts 1989, ch. 416, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.